tools/hyphenators/smj_hyph.tex
1p2i
p1ii
pin2
pi1r
p1í
2pj
p1jo
p1ju
p1jå
2pk
p1kl
p1kr
2p1l
plas1
p2lá
1p1m
pm2s
2p1n2
p2na
1po
poj1
p2ol
port1
pos1
2poy
2p1p
ppa1
pp2á
p2pc
ppe1
2pr2
prab1
p2ru
2ps
ps1ac
ps1av
ps1d
p2si
ps2k
p1s2n
ps1r
ps1s
p1su
p2sy
p1s1æ
2p1š
pšoo1
2p1t
ptad1
pta1s
p1þ
1pu
p1ud
p1uk
pum1
pu2sj1
p1uv
p1uz
2p2v2
pvc1
2p1w
p1x
1p1y
pyeh1
pyle1
p2yr
2p1z
2pæ
1pä1
1p2ø
1på
p1åh
p2ås
p1åt
p1åv
2p2'
2p2`
2p2´
1qa
2q1ap
qa1t
qba1
1qe2
q1f
qg2
qh2
qhl1
1q2i
qi2a
q1í
q2l
ql1u
qm2
q1n2
qner1
q1o
q1p
2qq
qr2
q1s
q1t
qtu1
1q2v
q1æ
qøn1
qå2
2q´
1r2a
ra1b
2rac
ra2dæ
raht1
ra2ku
ralá1
ra1n2
ra2nj
rass1
ra1y
1r2á
r1áb
r2ád
r1áh
2rán
2rá2r
2rb
rber1
rb2k
rb2l
rbl1i
2rc
2r1č
2r1d
rd2b1
rd1c
rd2d
rd1g
r2dm
r2dv
1r2e
re1b
r1ec
2r1ed
r1ei
r1ek
r1er
re2æä
r2é1
2r1f
r2fa
2r1g
r2ga.
rga2l
rgs1
rg1æ
2rh
r1ht
1r2i
rid1
2ridr
r1ien
rimá1
ri2me
2r2i1o
2risb
2riz
2r1í
2rj
r1ja
r1je
r1ji1
r1jn
r1jo
r1ju
r1jå
2rk
r2ka
rkj2
rkon1
rkt2
r1kv
rkx1
2r1l
2r1m
rm2s
r2mæ
2r2n2
r2naa
rna1s
r1ná
r1no
r1nu
2rŋ
2roa
r1oar
1rob
2rof
1roge
1rok
1rolf
2rom
rop1
ros2
ro2sa
1rot
2r1ò
2rp
r2pa
r1pá
r1pj2
r1ps
r2q
2r1r
rra1
rr2á
rre1n
rr2n
rr1oa
rr2å
2r1s
rs1b
rsen1
r2s1j
rs2k
rs2m
rs2p
rssi1
rs2t
2r1t
rta1t
rt2g
r2ti
rt1m
rt1n
rtni1
r2t1o2
rtog1
r2ts
r2tu
r2tv
r2tå
1r2u
ru1i
2rup
2r1ur
2rus
rut1
2r1v
rve1
2rw
1rwg
r1wi
r1ww
2r1x1
r2xe
2r2y
ryt1
2ræ
1r2ø
r1øa
røf1
røm1
2røy
r2öy
1rå
r1åj
r1ån
r1ås
råsj1
r1åt
r2åv
2r'
2r`
2r´
1sa
s2aa
2s1ab`
saca1
s2ag
s2aj
s1ake
s1akt
2sal
s2an
sap1
2sa1r
s2av.
2savl
say1
s2a'
s2a`
s2a´
1s2á
s1ádd
sáff1
sá1ht
sáj1
sá1n
sá1s
2sb
sba1n
sb2b
sb2f
sbh1
sbib1
sb1ji
2s1c2
s2cg
sc2h1
s2cæ
2s1č
s1ç
2sd
s2da
sd1c
sdha1
s2d1i
sd2n
s1do
s1dr
s2d1å
sd2ål
1s2e
2sec
2sed
s1ef
se2g
sega1
se1h
s1elv
sem1
2s2eo
sers1
2ses
2seu
s1é
1sè
2s1f2
s2fo
2s1g
sg1á
2s1h2
s2hi
shj2
1s2i
s1id.
si2d1á
s1ied
s1iel
si2l1
s1ilj
si2m1a
sine1
2sio
2s1ip
2s1iq
sisá1
siv1
2s1í
s2j
2sj.
sj1as
1sjá
2sjd
1sje
sje1d
2sjh
sj1i
2sj1k
2sjl
2sjm
2sjn
1sjo
sj1oa
sj1on
2s1jp
s1ju
sj1y
2sjä
2s1jö1
1sjåv
2s1k
sk2n
sk2s
s2kv
s2kö
2sl
slam1
s1lá
s1ls
s2lå
2sm
s1mb
s2me
sm2ka
sm2n
s1mo
sm2s
sm1v
s1mø
2s1n
sne1
sn2n
snno1
sno1a
s2ny1
1s2o
so2má
so2me
so2m1i
2sox
2soy
2so'
2s1ó
2s2p2
spar1
sp2l
s2på
1sq
2sr
sr2d
s1rh
s1ro
s1rw
s2r1å
2ss
s2saf
ss1al
ss1áj
ss1ám
ss1b
ssba1
ss1d
s1sg
ssin1
s1sj
ssji1
sska1
sski1
ss1l
ss1m
ss1s
sste1
s1su
ss1v
s1så
s1š
2s1t
s2taa
st1f
s2ti
stid1
st2ra
st2t
st1y
st2æ
s2t1ø1
s1þ
s2u
2s1uk
1sun
1suo
s1ur
su2s
susa1
2s1uv
s2uæ
s1ü
2s2v
s1v1h
sv1r
sv2s
sv1un
s1w
2s1x
sxi1
1sy
s1y2a
sy1s
2s1z
2sæ
sæl1
s1æäd
s1æäl
s1æän
1sä
s1ø
s2øa
1søl
s1ö
sör1
2så
såd1
s1åh
såli1
s1ås
s1åt
2s2'
2s2`
2s2´
ša2i
šbas1
š1c2
šcd1
šd2
šeb2
šebd1
šeks1
š1j
š2k
škka1
šk2v
š2l
š1m2
1šn2
š2o
šp2
š1r2
šs2
šs2f
š1š
št2
1šu
š1v2
šxi1
šysk1
š1å
1t2a
ta1b
ta2bi
tad1g
ta1r
tau1
1t2á
t1áh
táj1
tá2m1
tán1j
2tár
2tás
tása1
2t1b
t2ba
tber1
2t1c
t2cd1
t2co
2t1č
2t1d2
t2da
1t2e
2tei
tek1
teli1
2tem
tes1á
tese1
tes1m
tess1
tev1
2t1ex
2t1é
2tf1
t2fa
t1fg
2t1g
2t1h
th2t
t2hv
1t2i
2tib
t1id
t1ih
ti2k1
till1
tim1
ti2ma
tin1
2t1iv
2t1í
1t2j
2tjd
tje1
2tjg
t1jn
tjok1
2tjs
2tjt
2tjä
t1jå
2t1k2
tkä1
2t1l2
tlas1
tlf1
2tm2
tmar1
tme1
t2mem
tmlj2
t2mo
t1mä
2tn
t1ná
t1nj
t1no
t1n2p
t1ns
tn2t
1t2o
t1ob
tok1
to2ka
t1oo
t1org
tos2
2tò
2t2p
2t1q
2t1r2
1t2rah
tre1n
t2rib
tru1
t2rö
1t2s2
2tsa.
tsar1
tsas1
2tsd
tse1
2tsie
t1sj
2tsk
2t1sl
2t1ss
2tsv
2tsw
2t1t
tt1ak
tta1n
t2tet
ttji1
tto1
tt2r
tt2ru
t2tv
tt1y
tt1æ
1tu
tu1k
t2ur
tura1
t1uy
tu1æ
1t2v
tvj2
tv2r
2tw
t1wa
t1we
twh1
2t1x
2t2y
t1y2a
tyv1
2t1z
2tæ
t1æäh
tä1
t2ø
t1øk
2tö
töyk1
1tå
t2åd
tåga1
t1ån
tår1
t2åt
2t'
2t`
2t´
ŧek1
ŧgad1
ŧoy1
ŧp2
ŧs2
ŧtyr1
ŧxt2
ŧys1
ŧz2
1þi
þis1
u1a
uang1
u1á
ub1a
ubes1
u2bio
ubli1
ubl2j
uc2
uch1
u1d
ud1f
ud2i
1udm
u2dr
1ud´
u2e
uek1
2u1f
uf1d
u2fj
u2fl
u2fy
2u1g
uga1s
u2gr
ugs1
u2gu
ug2æ
u2hi
u2i
ui2a
u1ie
2uj
u1ja
u1já
ujcd1
ujd1
u1ji
u1jo
u1ju
ukat1
u2kl
u2kr
uktu1
uk1æ
2u1l
ulad1
ulmi1
ulu1s
u1m
u2m1a
u2mc
um1j
u2m1o
um1t
unie1
u1no
u1nu
u2ny
2uo
u1oa
u1oi
uoli1
uo2l1u
uon1
uori1
uot1
uovd1
u1ox
u1ó
u1p
upa1
up1c
u2pd
u2pe
u2pg
u2pm
up1r
up1s
u2pu
u2på
u2r1al
1urá
u2re
urge1
uri1m
ur1p
ur2t1
1urø
u2rå
us1á
1usb
us1e
usek1
us1e1s
u2sis
u2sj
us1ja
us2la
us1m
u2so
us2to
u2s1u
us1å
u2š
2u1t
ut1n
u2ts
u2tv
ut1æ
u2tå
1uvj
uv1k
u1vo
uvti1
u1wa
u2x1
u1yk
u1ze
2uæ
u1ä
u1å
u2'
u2`
u2´
ü1b
ü1d
üden1
ü1g
üj2
2ür
ürt1
1üs
ü1t
ú1g
û1n
1v2a
2vab
va1h
va1i
va1k
va2m1
va1n2
va1r
vas1á
va1sj
vass1
va1u
va1v
va1y
1v2á
vád1
v1áh
váre1
vb2
vb2l
vc1m
2vd
vd1b
vd1i
vd1m
v2dv
1ve
ve2i1
ven1
ve1p
v1ex
v1f
2vg
1vg.
2vga
v2gaj
v1go
1vgs
1vh
v2ha
vhal1
vhj2
v1ht
1v2i
vig1
vird1
1v2í
2vj
v1ja
v1ji
2vk
v1ká
vk1b
v1kg
vkh1
vkki1
v1kr
2v1l
1v1m
v2ma1
vmma1
vmås1
2v1n2
v2nj2
vnne1
v1oa
v1ok
voll1
1von
vonf1
vora1
vorr1
v1os
v1p
v1ro
vrrá1
vrre1
vrås1
2v1s
vs1áh
vs1b
v2s1j2
vs2k1
vs2t
v1š
2v1t
vt1m
v2to
v2tv
v1þ
1vu
vuga1
vuli1
vu2m1
vuol1
2vur
v1ü
2v1v2
vva1
vve1
vvå1
1v1w
v1x
vx1a
1v1y
vyl1
v2æ
v1æä
1vä
v1ø
v1ö
1vå
v1å1d
v1åh
våj1
vå1l
v2ån
våp1
2v'
2v´
wa2a
1wat2
watt1
wauf1
w1á
2w1b
1w2c
wc1n
w1ç
2wd
1we2
web1
weh1
w1ek
w1el
w1em
2w2f
wf1as
2wg
w1ge
w1go
w2h
wh1b
wh1æ
1w2i
w1il
wing1
w1í
2wj
2wk
w2m
w1n
2wp2
wqa1
2w2r2
wren1
wri1
w2s2
w2t
w1ud
1wü
wwj2
1wwm
1www
w1x
wyc1
2w1z
wä1
1wø1
w1å
wås1
2w'
2w`
2w´
xa1a
x1ak
1xav
x1b2
x1c
x2c1i
2x1d2
2x1e1
x1es
1x1f2
1xh2
x1hy
2x1i
xid1å
1xin
x1í
2xj
x1ja
x1k
1xm2
xmin1
x1mp
x1n
2x1o
x1ò
x1p2
x1r
1xs2
xs2l
xtra1
1xu
1xx
x1y
x1æ
2x'
2x`
2x2´
y1a
1ya.
ya1i
yak1
1yakv
1yam
yani1
yant1
1yat
y2av
y1b2
y2br
ybul1
2yc
y2cv
y2d1
ydá1
1y2e
ye1p
y1er
y1e1t
2yg
y1ge
ygi1
ygie1
yi2a
y1ie
2yj1
y1jn
y1k
1ykkö
1ykr
y2kü
y1l
2y1n
yna1
yng1
ynko1
1y1o
y2ok
y2ol
y2on
york1
y2os
y1p
y1r
1yrj
y2ro
yrå1
2ys
ys2n
2yt
yt1m
yto1
y2ts
1yu
y1v
yv1g
yv1k
y1w
yxt2
yy1
yyt1
y1ö
y2å
ý2r
1za
zad1
zar1
za2y
1zá
zá1j
z2áš
z1b
z2ba
zbt1
z1c2
zcg1
zd2
1zee
zel2
1ze2r
zf2
zfid1
2zh2
zh1ed
z2hf
1zi
z1ii
1zj2
zlád1
z1l2l
z1n2
z2o
zo2d1
zo2n1
z1ò
z1r2
zrom1
zs2
z1š
z1t2
ztv1
1zu
zup1
2z1v
z2w
z1x
2z1z
z1æ
z1ø
zøs1
žb2
že1p
žes1
žh2
žp2
žs2
žud1
žys1
ž1ž
æc2
æd2
æ1e
æg2
æi2
æ2k
æko2
2æl
æm2
æn2
æren1
æs2
æsa1
æsvs1
æ1sø
æv2
æ1vo
æ2ä
1æädn
1æäi
1æäjg
1æälv
1æän`
æäso1
1æäy
æøs1
ä1a
ä1ak
ä1á
ä2b2
äbá1
ä2c
ä1ç
ä2d2
ädd2
ä1e
äeks1
ä1é
ä1f
ä2g2
ägás1
äh2
ähk2
ähp2
äht2
äi1
ä1id
ä1ie
ä1ig
ä2is1
ä1í
äj2
ä2já
äjb2
äjd2
äjg2
ä1ji
äjk2
äjl2
äjm2
äjn2
äjv2
ä2k2
ä1kr
äl2
ä2lá
älb2
älg2
ä2li
älk2
äll2
älla1
ällu1
ällå1
ä2lo
älok1
älv2
ä2m2
äms2
ä2n
1än2g
än2n2
än2r
än2t2
än1æ
ä1nå
ä2ŋ2
äŋŋ2
ä1o
äoh1
ä1ó
ä1ò
ä2p2
äpid1
äpp2
ä1q
ä2r2
ärb2
ärg2
ärj2
ärk2
ärm2
ärn2
ärt2
ärv2
ä2s2
äsm2
äsok1
äss2
ä1sv
ä1š
ä2t2
ä1u
äuo1
äv2
äval1
ä2vá
ä2vi
ävk2
ävn2
ävr2
ävt2
ä1w
ä1x
ä1ya
ä1ym
ä1z2
ä1æ
ää1
ä1äl
ä1än1
ä1ät
ä1ø
äøf1
äøk1
äøl1
ä1å2
äåt1
ø1a
øad1
1øag
1øal
øa2t
øban1
øc2
ød2d
øeks1
øf1s
1øg
ø1ie
ø1í
øk2
ø2kå
1øl
øl1h
øl2l
øm2b
2øn
øor1
ør2n
2øs
øs2r
øs2t
1øt
øt2b
øug1
øw1
øwik1
øx2
2ø2y2
øya1
øye1
øy1s2
øyt1
ö1a
öa2p1
ö2c2
ög2
öh2
ö1j
ö1k
öl2
ö1lá
ölds1
1ölm
öm2
1ö1n2
ö2nj
öod1
öpp2
öps1
1öre
ör2g
ör1k
ös2
1ösa
1öse
ös2m
ö2s1o
öte1
ötv1
ö2v
över1
öwc1
2öy
öz2
öøf1
1åa
åbdi1
å1bf
åc2
å1dá
åd1j
ådne1
å1do
åek1
å1f2
å1g
åge1
åggi1
ågi1
åg1s
1åhn
å1hå
å1i
å1ja
å1je
å2j1i
å1ju
1åjv
å2k1
åkie1
å1kr
1åkri
1åkt
ål2s
2åm
å2m1o
åms1
å2n1e
å1nj
ånn1
å1nu
2åŋ
åŋgi1
å1o
åp2
åpe1
åpt1
år2j
1år1o1
års1s
å1s
1åsal
1åse
å2sj
åsj2d
ås1l
åssu1
ås1v
åš2
åtsi1
åtvi1
åt1ø
å2t1å
1åt`
å1u
å2vm
åv2r
1åvt
å1w
å1å
åås1
'2h
'ha1
'j2
`j2
´j2
1°2c1
°2f1
